District of Columbia statutes.
38-902

School officials not to profit on supplies or textbooks purchased for schools.

No school official, teacher, or member of the Board of Education shall receive any pecuniary benefit on account of school supplies or textbooks purchased for the use of the public schools in the District of Columbia.

History

Aug. 7, 1894, 28 Stat. 254, ch. 232

Cross References

Purchase of school books and supplies, see § 38-701 et seq.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-2202.
1973 Ed., § 31-1104.